Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1406
Settlement; authorized.

A claim or right arising under the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act or on a rental agreement may be settled by agreement.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 5.